District of Columbia statutes.
25-433

Decisions of the board; petition for reconsideration.

(a)

No application shall be approved until the Board has determined that the applicant has complied with § 25-402(a)(8) through (10) [now (7) through (9)] (and § 25-402(b) if the applicant is a restaurant or hotel) or, in the case of a renewal, has fulfilled the license requirements of this title. The Board shall make findings of fact with respect to each requirement, including the appropriateness standards set forth in §§ 25-313, 25-314, and 25-315, and the food sales requirements for restaurants and hotels.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the record shall close 30 days after a hearing is concluded to allow the parties to submit proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law and any other document submissions requested by the Board.

(c)

Within 90 days after the close of the record, the Board shall issue its written decision accompanied by findings of fact and conclusions of law. For new license applications, the Board shall issue its written decisions accompanied by findings of fact and conclusions of law within 60 days after the close of the record. The Board shall publish and maintain a compilation of its decisions and orders.

(d)

(1)

A petition for reconsideration, rehearing, reargument, or stay of a decision or order of the Board may be filed by a party within 10 days after the date of receipt of the Board’s final order.

(2)

The filing or the granting of a petition filed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not stay the final order unless the stay is specifically ordered by the Board.

(3)

A stay shall be granted only upon good cause, which shall consist of unusual or exceptional circumstances.

(e)

The Board may establish procedures under § 25-211(b) to consider an application which is not protested during the protest period.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1702(i), 49 DCR 6968
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(q), 60 DCR 3410
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(c)(2), 62 DCR 1866
This section is referenced in § 25-432.
1981 Ed., § 25-433.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.
D.C. Law 14-190, in subsec. (b), substituted “30” for “10”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 added the second sentence in (c).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 rewrote (b).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1702(i) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary amendment of (c), see § 2(q) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(q) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).